Utah statutes.
38-1a-405.   Preconstruction liens on equal footing.

(1)  Each preconstruction lien on a project property is on equal footing with every other preconstruction lien on the project property, regardless of:

(a)  when the claimant submitted the claimant's notice of preconstruction service for recording;

(b)  when the claimant submitted the claimant's notice of preconstruction lien for recording; or

(c)  when the preconstruction service related to the lien occurs.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not affect the priority of a construction lender's mortgage or trust deed, as established under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 464, 2013 General Session

